Illinois, session 104th, HB2655.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 9.45 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/9.45 new)7    Sec. 9.45. Artificial intelligence education report.8    (a) Within 18 months after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Board shall 10prepare and submit to the General Assembly a report on the 11state of artificial intelligence education and development in 12public and private institutions of higher education. The 13report shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following 14information:15        (1) All existing academic programs and courses focused 16    on educating students about the use, development, and 17    ethical and social implications of artificial intelligence 18    systems.19        (2) All future plans for implementing such programs 20    and courses.21        (3) All current and future plans for research projects 22    studying the use, development, and implications of 23    artificial intelligence.  HB2655- 2 -LRB104 10863 LNS 20945 b1        (4) All current and future plans for the development 2    of artificial intelligence systems in public and private 3    institutions of higher education.4        (5) Recommendations to the General Assembly to further 5    develop programs and course offerings studying artificial 6    intelligence.7        (6) Recommendations on the best way to implement a 8    State-funded grant program to promote the academic study 9    and commercial development of artificial intelligence in 10    public and private institutions of higher education and to 11    fulfill all of the following objectives:12            (A) To develop labs to provide students hands-on, 13        artificial intelligence learning experiences.14            (B) To develop virtual learning platforms that 15        facilitate remote and individualized artificial 16        intelligence education opportunities.17            (C) To develop programming and pedagogical tools 18        with respect to artificial intelligence education and 19        instruction for the benefit of elementary and 20        secondary school teachers and community education.21    (b) This Section is repealed 2 years after the effective 22date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.